Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 3. Filing of Documents

Cross references. —

As to public records, see article 2 of this chapter.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

66 Am. Jur. 2d Records and Recording Law § 4.

76 C.J.S. Records § 4.

§ 16-4-301.
When documents deemed filed.

Any report, claim, tax return, statement or other document or any payment required or authorized to be filed or made to the state of Wyoming or to any political subdivision thereof, which is:

Transmitted through the United States mail, shall be deemed filed or made and received by the state or political subdivisions on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon the envelope or other appropriate wrapper containing it;

Mailed but not received by the state or political subdivisions or where received and the cancellation mark is illegible, erroneous or omitted, shall be deemed filed or made and received on the date it was mailed if the sender establishes by competent evidence that the report, claim, tax return, statement or other document or payment was deposited in the United States mail on or before the date for filing or paying.

In cases of nonreceipt of any report, tax return, statement or other document or payment required by law to be filed or made, the sender shall file with the state or political subdivision a duplicate within thirty (30) days after written notification is given to the sender that the state or political subdivision did not receive the report, tax return, statement or other document or payment or paragraph (a)(ii) of this section does not apply.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.6; W.S. 1977, §

9-10-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Applied

in

Fullmer v. Wyoming Emp. Sec. Comm'n, 858 P.2d 1122,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 16-4-302.
Competent evidence of delivery.

If any report, claim, tax return, statement or other document or payment is sent by United States mail and either registered or certified, a record authenticated by the United States post office of the registration or certification is competent evidence that the report, claim, tax return, statement or other document or payment was delivered to the state officer or state agency or officer or agency of the political subdivision to which addressed, and the date of registration or certification is deemed the postmarked date.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 61, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.7; W.S. 1977, § 9-10-102; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-303.
Filing date falling on Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.

If the date for filing any report, claim, tax return, statement or other document or making any payment falls upon a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, the acts shall be considered timely if performed on the next business day.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 61, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.8; W.S. 1977, §

9-10-103

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-304.
Applicability of provisions.

W.S.

16-4-301

through

16-4-304

apply only to those reports, claims, tax returns, statements and other documents and payments for which failure or neglect to file or make the same subjects a person, firm or corporation to criminal or civil penalties or forfeitures.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 61, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.9; W.S. 1977, §

9-10-104

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.